Massachusetts, session 194th, H3322.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 53 of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out the fourth sentence of the definition of “Privatization contract”
and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- An agreement solely to provide legal or
management consulting services shall not be considered a privatization contract.
of 1